Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.850

Organized crime intelligence unit—Created.

There is hereby created in the Washington state patrol an organized crime intelligence unit which shall be under the direction of the chief of the Washington state patrol.

[ 1973 1st ex.s. c 202 s 1.]